Hawaii statutes.
[§321-236] Emergency medical
services; use of latex gloves prohibited. [Section effective January 1,
2017.] The use of latex gloves by personnel providing ambulance services
or emergency medical services pursuant to this part shall be prohibited. [L 2016,
c 180, §3]

Cross References

Dental health facilities; health care facilities; use of
latex gloves, see §321-11.9.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next